el: Συνιστώμενο ύφασμα πατρόν ραπτικής: Καμβάς; Τζιν (Denim); Συνθετικό δέρμα/βινύλιο; Φλις; French terry; Χοντρό υφαντό; Πλεκτό interlock; Πλεκτό ζέρσεϊ; Πλεκτό (ελαστικό); Λεπτό υφαντό; Λινό; Μεσαίου βάρους υφαντό; Βαμβάκι καπιτονέ; Υφαντό ρεγιόν/βισκόζης; Μετάξι; Πλεκτό για πουλόβερ; Πλεκτό για μαγιό; Ύφασμα επιπλώσεων; Υφαντό (μη ελαστικό); Άλλο
es: Patrón de costura recomendado para la tela: Lona; Mezclilla; Cuero sintético/vinilo; Tela polar; Rizo francés; Tejido de peso pesado; Tejido interlock; Tejido de punto jersey; Tejido de punto (elástico); Tejido de peso ligero; Lino; Tejido de peso medio; Algodón para acolchar; Tejido de rayón/viscosa; Seda; Tejido de punto para suéter; Tejido de punto para traje de baño; Tela de tapicería; Tejido (no elástico); Otro
ro-RO: Material recomandat pentru tiparul de croitorie: Pânză (canvas); Denim; Piele ecologică/vinilin; Fleece; French terry; Material țesut greu; Tricot interlock; Tricot jerse; Tricot (stretch); Material țesut ușor; In; Material țesut de greutate medie; Bumbac pentru quilting; Material țesut din raion/vâscoză; Mătase; Tricot pentru pulovere; Tricot pentru costume de baie; Material pentru tapițerie; Material țesut (non-stretch); Altele
de: Empfohlener Stoff für das Schnittmuster: Canvas; Denim; Kunstleder/Vinyl; Fleece; French Terry; Schwere Webstoffe; Interlock-Jersey; Jersey; Strick (Stretch); Leichte Webstoffe; Leinen; Mittelschwerer Webstoff; Quilt-Baumwolle; Viskose-Webstoff; Seide; Pullover-Strick; Bademoden-Strick; Polsterstoff; Webstoff (ohne Stretch); Sonstige
ko: 재봉 패턴에 추천하는 원단: 캔버스; 데님; 인조 가죽/비닐; 플리스; 프렌치 테리; 헤비웨이트 우븐; 인터록 니트; 저지 니트; 니트(스트레치); 라이트웨이트 우븐; 리넨; 중간 두께 직물; 퀼팅용 면; 레이온/비스코스 직물; 실크; 스웨터 니트; 수영복 니트; 실내 장식용 직물; 직물(신축성 없음); 기타
zh-TW: 縫紉樣板建議布料: 帆布; 丹寧布; 人造皮革/乙烯基; 刷毛布料; 法國毛圈布; 重磅梭織布; 雙面針織布; 平紋針織布; 針織布 (具彈性); 輕磅梭織布; 亞麻; 中等重量梭織; 絎縫棉; 嫘縈/粘膠梭織; 絲綢; 毛衣針織; 泳衣針織; 裝飾布料; 梭織 (無彈性); 其他
da: Anbefalet stof for symønster: Lærred; Denim; Imiteret læder/vinyl; Fleece; Isoli; Kraftigt vævet stof; Interlock-strik; Jersey-strik; Strik (stræk); Let vævet stof; Hør; Mellemkraftigt vævet; Patchwork-bomuld; Vævet rayon/viskose; Silke; Sweaterstrik; Badetøjsstrik; Møbelstof; Vævet (uden stræk); Andet
fr: Tissu recommandé pour le patron de couture: Toile; Denim; Similicuir/vinyle; Polaire; French terry; Tissu tissé lourd; Maille interlock; Maille jersey; Maille (extensible); Tissu léger; Lin; Tissé de poids moyen; Coton à courtepointe; Tissé de rayonne/viscose; Soie; Tricot pour pull; Tricot pour maillot de bain; Tissu d’ameublement; Tissé (non extensible); Autre
sk-SK: Odporúčaná látka pre šijací strih: Plátno; Denim; Umelá koža/vinyl; Flís; Teplákovina; Ťažká tkanina; Úplet (interlock); Úplet (džersej); Úplet (strečový); Ľahká tkanina; Ľan; Stredne ťažká tkanina; Bavlna na patchwork/quilting; Viskózová tkanina; Hodváb; Svetrovina; Plavkovina; Poťahová látka; Tkanina (pevná); Iné
nb: Anbefalt stoff for symønster: Kanvas; Denim; Kunstskinn/vinyl; Fleece; Isoli; Kraftig vevd; Interlock; Jersey; Strikket (stretch); Lett vevd; Lin; Mellomtungt vevd; Quiltebomull; Vevd rayon/viskose; Silke; Genserstrikk; Badetøystrikk; Møbelstoff; Vevd (uten stretch); Annet
ru: Рекомендуемая ткань для выкройки: Канвас; Деним; Искусственная кожа/винил; Флис; Футер; Плотная тканая; Трикотаж интерлок; Трикотаж джерси; Трикотаж (эластичный); Легкая тканая; Лён; Ткань средней плотности; Хлопок для квилтинга; Искусственный шелк / вискозная ткань; Шелк; Вязаный трикотаж; Трикотаж для купальников; Обивочная ткань; Ткань (неэластичная); Другое
ja: 縫製パターンの推奨生地: キャンバス; デニム; フェイクレザー/ビニール; フリース; フレンチテリー; 厚手織物; インターロックニット; ジャージーニット; ニット (ストレッチ); 薄手織物; リネン; 中厚手織物; キルティングコットン; レーヨン/ビスコース織物; シルク; セーターニット; スイムニット; 室内装飾用生地; 織物 (伸縮性なし); その他
it: Tessuto consigliato per il cartamodello: Tela; Denim; Ecopelle/Vinile; Pile; Spugna francese; Tessuto pesante; Maglia interlock; Maglia jersey; Maglia (elasticizzata); Tessuto leggero; Lino; Tessuto a navetta di peso medio; Cotone per patchwork; Tessuto a navetta in rayon/viscosa; Seta; Maglia per maglioni; Maglia per costumi da bagno; Tessuto da tappezzeria; Tessuto a navetta (non elasticizzato); Altro
tr: Dikiş kalıbı için önerilen kumaş: Kanvas; Kot; Suni deri/vinil; Polar; İki iplik; Ağır gramajlı dokuma; İnterlok örme; Jarse örme; Örme (esnek); Hafif gramajlı dokuma; Keten; Orta ağırlıkta dokuma; Kapitonelik pamuklu; Suni ipek/viskon dokuma; İpek; Triko örgü; Mayoluk örgü; Döşemelik kumaş; Dokuma (esnek olmayan); Diğer
cs: Doporučený střih látky: Plátno; Džínovina; Umělá kůže / vinyl; Fleece; Výplněk (french terry); Těžká tkanina; Pletenina interlock; Pletenina žerzej; Pletenina (strečová); Lehká tkanina; Len; Středně těžká tkanina; Bavlna na patchwork; Viskóza / umělé hedvábí (tkané); Hedvábí; Svetrová pletenina; Plavkovina; Potahová látka; Tkanina (nepružná); Jiné
pt-BR: Molde de costura tecido recomendado: Lona; Jeans; Couro sintético/vinil; Fleece; Moletom careca (French terry); Tecido plano pesado; Malha interlock; Malha jersey; Malha (com elasticidade); Tecido plano leve; Linho; Tecido plano de peso médio; Algodão para quilting; Tecido plano de rayon/viscose; Seda; Malha de suéter; Malha para moda praia; Tecido de estofamento; Tecido plano (sem elasticidade); Outros
hu: Varrásminta ajánlott anyaga: Vászon; Farmeranyag; Műbőr / Vinil; Polár; French terry; Nehéz szövésű; Interlock kötött; Jersey kötött; Kötött (stretch); Könnyű szövésű; Len; Közepes vastagságú szövött; Foltvarró pamut; Műselyem/viszkóz szövött; Selyem; Kötött pulóveranyag; Fürdőruhaanyag; Kárpitszövet; Szövött (nem rugalmas); Egyéb
zh-CN: 缝纫图纸推荐面料: 帆布; 牛仔布; 人造革/乙烯基; 抓绒; 毛圈布; 厚重梭织布; 双面针织布; 平纹针织布; 针织布（弹力）; 轻薄梭织布; 亚麻; 中等克重梭织布; 绗缝棉; 人造丝/粘胶纤维梭织布; 丝绸; 毛衣针织物; 泳装针织物; 室内装潢面料; 梭织物（无弹力）; 其他
vi: Mẫu may được đề xuất loại vải: Vải canvas; Vải denim; Giả da/vinyl; Vải nỉ lông; Vải thun da cá; Vải dệt thoi dày; Vải dệt kim interlock; Vải dệt kim jersey; Vải dệt kim (co giãn); Vải dệt thoi mỏng; Vải lanh; Vải dệt thoi dày vừa; Vải cotton chần bông; Vải dệt thoi rayon/viscose; Lụa; Vải len dệt kim; Vải dệt kim đồ bơi; Vải bọc đồ nội thất; Vải dệt thoi (không co giãn); Khác
fi: Kaavalle suositeltu kangas: Markiisi; Denim; Tekonahka/vinyyli; Fleece; Joustofrotee; Paksu kudottu kangas; Interlock-neulos; Jersey-neulos; Neulos (joustava); Ohut kudottu kangas; Pellava; Keskivahva kudottu; Tilkkutyöpuuvilla; Kudottu rayon/viskoosi; Silkki; Neule; Uimapukukangas; Verhoilukangas; Kudottu (joustamaton); Muu
th: ผ้าที่แนะนำสำหรับแพทเทิร์นการตัดเย็บ: ผ้าแคนวาส; ผ้าเดนิม; หนังเทียม/ไวนิล; ผ้าฟลีซ; ผ้าเฟรนช์เทอร์รีย์; ผ้าทอเนื้อหนา; ผ้าถักอินเตอร์ล็อก; ผ้าถักเจอร์ซีย์; ผ้ายืด (ถัก); ผ้าทอเนื้อบาง; ลินิน; ผ้าทอความหนาปานกลาง; ผ้าฝ้ายควิลท์; ผ้าทอเรยอน/วิสคอส; ผ้าไหม; ผ้าถักสเวตเตอร์; ผ้าถักชุดว่ายน้ำ; ผ้าบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์; ผ้าทอ (ไม่ยืด); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tecido recomendado para o molde de costura: Lona; Ganga; Imitação de couro/vinil; Polar; French terry; Tecido pesado; Malha interlock; Malha jersey; Malha (stretch); Tecido leve; Linho; Tecido de gramagem média; Algodão para patchwork; Tecido de rayon/viscose; Seda; Malha para camisolas; Malha para fatos de banho; Tecido para estofos; Tecido (não elástico); Outro
nl: Naaipatroon aanbevolen stof: Canvas; Denim; Kunstleer/vinyl; Fleece; French terry; Zware geweven stof; Interlock tricot; Jersey tricot; Gebreid/tricot (stretch); Lichte geweven stof; Linnen; Middelzware geweven stof; Quiltkatoen; Geweven rayon/viscose; Zijde; Gebreide truienstof; Zwemstof; Meubelstof; Geweven (niet-rekbaar); Overig
lt-LT: Siuvimo modelio rekomenduojamas audinys: Drobė; Džinsas; Dirbtinė oda / vinilas; Flysas; Kilpinis trikotažas („French terry“); Sunkus austas audinys; Dvipusis trikotažas („Interlock“); Kulirinis trikotažas („Jersey“); Trikotažas (tamprus); Lengvas austas audinys; Linas; Vidutinio svorio austas audinys; Skiautinių medvilnė; Austas viskozės audinys; Šilkas; Megztinis trikotažas; Maudymosi kostiumėlių trikotažas; Baldinis audinys; Austas audinys (netamprus); Kita
sv: Rekommenderat tyg för sömnadsmönster: Canvas; Denim; Konstläder/vinyl; Fleece; French terry; Kraftigt vävt tyg; Interlocktrikå; Jerseytrikå; Trikå (stretch); Tunt vävt tyg; Linne; Mellantjockt vävt; Quiltbomull; Vävd rayon/viskos; Siden; Tröjstickat; Baddräktsstickat; Möbeltyg; Vävt (utan stretch); Övrigt
sl-SI: Priporočena tkanina za šivalni kroj: Platno; Denim; Umetno usnje/vinil; Flis; French terry; Težko tkano blago; Interlock pletenina; Pletenina jersey; Pletenina (raztegljiva); Lahko tkano blago; Lan; Srednje težko tkano blago; Bombaž za prešivanje; Viskoza/rajon (tkano); Svila; Pletenina za puloverje; Pletenina za kopalke; Blago za oblazinjenje; Tkano blago (neraztegljivo); Drugo
hr-HR: Preporučana tkanina za šivanje uzorka: Platno; Traper (denim); Umjetna koža / vinil; Flis; French terry; Teška tkana tkanina; Interlock pletivo; Džersej pletivo; Pletivo (rastezljivo); Lagana tkana tkanina; Lan; Srednje teška tkana tkanina; Pamuk za prošivanje; Tkani rajon/viskoza; Svila; Pletivo za pulovere; Pletivo za kupaće kostime; Tkanina za tapeciranje; Tkano (nerastezljivo); Ostalo
en: Sewing pattern recommended fabric: Canvas; Denim; Faux leather/vinyl; Fleece; French terry; Heavyweight woven; Interlock knit; Jersey knit; Knit (stretch); Lightweight woven; Linen; Midweight woven; Quilting cotton; Rayon/viscose woven; Silk; Sweater knit; Swim knit; Upholstery fabric; Woven (non-stretch); Other
bg-BG: Препоръчителен плат за шивашки модел: Канвас; Деним; Изкуствена кожа/винил; Полар; Френч тери; Плътна тъкан; Интерлок трикотаж; Жарсе трикотаж; Трикотаж (еластичен); Лека тъкан; Лен; Средно плътна тъкан; Памук за капитониране; Район/вискозна тъкан; Коприна; Трикотаж за пуловери; Трикотаж за бански; Плат за тапицерия; Тъкан (нееластична); Друго
pl: Zalecany materiał wzoru do szycia: Płótno; Jeans; Sztuczna skóra / winyl; Polar; Dresówka pętelkowa; Ciężka tkanina; Dzianina interlock; Dzianina dżersejowa; Dzianina (elastyczna); Lekka tkanina; Len; Średniej grubości tkanina; Bawełna do pikowania; Tkanina ze sztucznego jedwabiu/wiskozy; Jedwab; Dzianina swetrowa; Dzianina kąpielowa; Tkanina obiciowa; Tkanina (nierozciągliwa); Inne